Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7074.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24-8-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-8 entitled "Construction
and Maintenance of State Roads" is hereby amended to read as follows:
24-8-11. Beautification.
(a) The department of transportation is hereby authorized and empowered to plant trees,
shrubs and otherwise beautify the area within the limits of a road, including state highways in a
manner and at locations as the department may deem advisable,. Plantings shall include pollinator-
friendly native species when appropriate and the cost of the work shall be paid from moneys,
appropriated for highway purposes, not otherwise needed for the construction, reconstruction and
maintenance of state roads and bridges; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed
to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums as may from time
to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of
transportation. The department shall seek suggestions from apiarists, horticulturists and other
certified professionals to identify the appropriate types of plants and locations that benefit
pollinators. For the purposes of this section "pollinators" means insects to include, but not be
limited to, bees that help carry pollen from the male part of the flower to the female part of the
same or another flower.
(b) Any and all activities performed by the department of transportation to benefit
pollinators on roadsides and state highways shall be in compliance with § 23 U.S.C. 332.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003544
========
LC003544 - Page 2 of 3